Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-255
Department of Correctional Services; donation to county; damages paid by county.

The Department of Correctional Services is authorized by the Legislature to convey to the county of Lancaster, Nebraska, the real estate described in section 90-254 as a donation. Damages computed for removal of trees or fencing shall be paid by Lancaster County to the Department of Correctional Services Facility Cash Fund to be used for replacement of such trees and fencing.

Laws 1990, LB 970, § 2.